District of Columbia statutes.
50-1505.02

Interstate and intrastate privileges.

Rental fleets and utility trailers, owned by any person or firm engaging in the business of renting such vehicle, shall be extended full interstate and intrastate privileges, provided the following:

(1)

Such vehicle or trailers are part of a rental fleet and are identifiable as being a part of such fleet; and

(2)

Such person or firm registers a portion of said vehicles or trailers as provided in § 50-1505.03.

History

Mar. 6, 1979, D.C. Law 2-157, § 3, 25 DCR 6995

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 40-112.
1973 Ed., § 40-112.